Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1012.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the Sale and Distribution of Nonmotorized Trailers Exemption Act.Section 2. Purpose.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) That nonmotorized trailers do not operate under the traditional franchising model applicable to motor vehicle sales.(2) Dealers typically sell multiple trailer brands without exclusive territory or branding contracts.(3) Maintaining franchise restrictions on these trailers imposes unnecessary burdens on small businesses without 1234567891011121314151617181920 providing meaningful consumer benefit.(4) This act exempts nonmotorized trailers from the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, while preserving all other licensing and consumer protections.Section 3. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Board." The State Board of Vehicle Manufacturers, Dealers and Salespersons."Mobility vehicle." As defined in section 102 of the act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act."Motor vehicle." As defined in 75 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions). The term does not include a nonmotorized trailer."Nonmotorized trailer." A trailer or semitrailer designed to be drawn by a motor vehicle and not powered by an engine or motor, and which does not include integrated living quarters for human occupancy. The term includes a utility trailer, cargo trailer, dump trailer, gooseneck trailer and tilt-bed trailer.Section 4. Applicability.The act of December 22, 1983 (P.L.306, No.84), known as the Board of Vehicles Act, shall not apply to the sale, distribution or servicing of nonmotorized trailers.Section 5. Impact assessment.Three years after the effective date of this section, the board shall assess the impact of the exemption of the sale, distribution or servicing of nonmotorized trailers from the Board of Vehicles Act and report its findings to the 20250SB1012PN1173 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Transportation Committee of the Senate and the Transportation Committee of the House of Representatives.Section 6. Savings clause.This act does not affect existing contractual agreements or legal disputes.Section 7. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 90 days.20250SB1012PN1173 - 3 - 1234567